Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; TAIKOARTS MIDWEST.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to TaikoArts Midwest, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to acquire, renovate, equip, and furnish property located at 449 Front Avenue in the city of St. Paul to provide a home for TaikoArts Midwest and a multipurpose community event space. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end